Hawaii statutes.
§560:2-710 Worthier-title doctrine
abolished. The doctrine of worthier title is abolished as a rule of law
and as a rule of construction. Language in a governing instrument describing
the beneficiaries of a disposition as the transferor's "heirs",
"heirs at law", "next of kin", "distributees",
"relatives", or "family", or language of similar import,
does not create or presumptively create a reversionary interest in the
transferor. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next